Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-116
State soil; Holdrege series.

Soils of the Holdrege series, classified as Typic Argiustolls, fine-silty, mixed, mesic, is hereby adopted as the official state soil of Nebraska.

Laws 1979, LB 475, § 1.